src/morphology/stems/nynorsk-stems.lexc
LEXICON Prnyn
+Pr+Nynorsk: # ;

LEXICON Advnyn
+Adv+Nynorsk: # ;

LEXICON Anyn
+A+Nynorsk: # ;

LEXICON Vnyn
+V+Nynorsk: # ;

LEXICON Nnyn_m1
+N+Nynorsk: # ;

LEXICON Propnyn
+N+Prop+Nynorsk: # ;

LEXICON Pronnyn
+Pron+Nynorsk: # ;

LEXICON nnnb 
+Nynorsk: # ;

LEXICON Nynorsk
fra:frå Prnyn ;
uten:utan Prnyn ;
hos:hjå Prnyn ;
om:um Prnyn ;
noen:nokon Prnyn ;
hvordan:korleis Advnyn ;
ikke:ikkje Advnyn ;
også:òg Advnyn ;
da:då Advnyn ;
mer:meir Advnyn ;
mye:mykje Advnyn ;
bare:berre Advnyn ;
noe:noko Advnyn ;
sammen:saman Advnyn ;
selv:sjølv Advnyn ;
selv:sjølve Advnyn ;
hvor:kor Advnyn ;
hvor:kvar Advnyn ;
ellers:elles Advnyn ;
enda:enno Advnyn ;
nå:no Advnyn ;
oftest:oftast Advnyn ;
flere:fleire Anyn ;
egen:eigen Anyn ;
god:betre Anyn ;
gammel:gammal Anyn ;
trolig:truleg Anyn ;
nåværende:noverande Anyn ;
videregående:vidaregoande Anyn ;
tidlig:tidlegare Anyn ;
være:vore 	 Vnyn ;
komme:kjem	 Vnyn ;
finnes:finst Vnyn ;
få:fekk		 Vnyn ;
være:vera	 Vnyn ;
være:vere	 Vnyn ;
si:seie Vnyn ;
inneholde:inneheld Vnyn ;
kalle:kalla Vnyn ;
begynne:byrja Vnyn ;
kjent:kjend Anyn ;
født:fødd Anyn ;
noen:nokre Pronnyn ;
jeg:eg Pronnyn ;
dere:dykk Pronnyn ;
deres:deira Pronnyn ;
dere:dokker Pronnyn ;
dei:de Propnyn ;
Andesfjella:Andesfjella Propnyn ;
Antarktis:Antarktis Propnyn ;
Bardu:Bardu Propnyn ;
Beerenberg:Beerenberg Propnyn ;
Broadway:Broadway Propnyn ;
Bårdsson:Bårdsson Propnyn ;
Dampskibsselskab:Dampskibsselskab Propnyn ;
Disney:Disney Propnyn ;
Egeland:Egeland Propnyn ;
Einarson:Einarson Propnyn ;
Fana:Fana Propnyn ;
Fantomet:Fantomet Propnyn ;
Foods:Foods Propnyn ;
Fremskrittspartiet:Framstegspartiet Propnyn ;
Gunnarson:Gunnarson Propnyn ;
Gunnarsson:Gunnarsson Propnyn ;
Hegel:Hegel Propnyn ;
Hitler-Tyskland:Hitler-Tyskland Propnyn ;
Inc:Inc Propnyn ;
Midt-Norge:Midt-Noreg Propnyn ;
Niedersachsen:Niedersachsen Propnyn ;
Nord-Aurdal:Nord-Aurdal Propnyn ;
Nord-Europa:Nord-Europa Propnyn ;
Nord-Norge:Nord-Noreg Propnyn ;
Sør-Norge:Sør-Noreg Propnyn ;
Norge:Noreg Propnyn ;
Olavson:Olavson Propnyn ;
Olavsson:Olavsson Propnyn ;
Petersson:Petersson Propnyn ;
Prix:Prix Propnyn ;
Roaldsson:Roaldsson Propnyn ;
Samuelsson:Samuelsson Propnyn ;
Sentral-Afrika:Sentral-Afrika Propnyn ;
Sentral-Asia:Sentral-Asia Propnyn ;
Sentral-Europa:Sentral-Europa Propnyn ;
Sigurdsson:Sigurdsson Propnyn ;
Sør-Aurdal:Sør-Aurdal Propnyn ;
Sør-India:Sør-India Propnyn ;
Sør-Kina:Sør-Kina Propnyn ;
Sør-Troms:Sør-Troms Propnyn ;
Sørøst-Norge:Søraust-Noreg Propnyn ;
TVNorge:TVNorge Propnyn ;
Torgeirsson:Torgeirsson Propnyn ;
Trondsson:Trondsson Propnyn ;
Vest-Telemark:Vest-Telemark Propnyn ;
Wikimedia:Wikimedia Propnyn ;
Wikipedia:Wikipedia Propnyn ;
Øst-Norge:Aust-Noreg Propnyn ;
Øst-Tyskland:Aust-Tyskland Propnyn ;
Østerrike-Ungarn:Austerrike-Ungarn Propnyn ;
meget:mykje nnnb ;
noe:noko nnnb ;
mens:medan nnnb ;
siden:sidan nnnb ;
navn:namn nnnb ;
d:d nnnb ;
uten:utan nnnb ;
ett:eitt nnnb ;
egen:eigen nnnb ;
utenfor:utanfor nnnb ;
giv:gjev nnnb ;
tek:tek nnnb ;
regner:reknar nnnb ;
vald:vald nnnb ;
innenfor:innanfor nnnb ;
fyrst:fyrst nnnb ;
flertall:fleirtal nnnb ;
jeg:eg nnnb ;
folketall:folketal nnnb ;
sammenheng:samanheng nnnb ;
innvirkning:innverknad nnnb ;
b:b nnnb ;
påverknad:påverknad nnnb ;
virksomhet:verksemd nnnb ;
noe:somme nnnb ;
spildre:spele nnnb ;
organist:organist nnnb ;
nedenfor:nedanfor nnnb ;
utgave:utgåve nnnb ;
ordfører:ordførar nnnb ;
måndag:måndag nnnb ;
aids:aids nnnb ;
spiller:spelar nnnb ;
høyre:høgre nnnb ;
bles:bles nnnb ;
skildrer:skildrar nnnb ;
val:val nnnb ;
skille:skilje nnnb ;
rødfarge:raude nnnb ;
bønn:bøn nnnb ;
visshet:visse nnnb ;
tegn:teikn nnnb ;
norn:norn nnnb ;
hovedstad:hovudstad nnnb ;
bosetning:busetjing nnnb ;
dott:lagde nnnb ;
skar:tronge nnnb ;
kongsemne:kongsemne nnnb ;
ungdomsskole:ungdomsskule nnnb ;
oppmerksomhet:merksemd nnnb ;
innerste:inste nnnb ;
etternavn:etternamn nnnb ;
sammenligning:samanlikning nnnb ;
innhold:innhald nnnb ;
verdenskrig:verdskrig nnnb ;
sommer:sommar nnnb ;
opphold:opphald nnnb ;
hode:hovud nnnb ;
fakultet:fakultet nnnb ;
unntagen:unnateke nnnb ;
strykeinstrument:strykeinstrument nnnb ;
prestegard:prestegard nnnb ;
kvinnenavn:kvinnenamn nnnb ;
hjort:hjort nnnb ;
flaum:flaum nnnb ;
begynner:byrjar nnnb ;
utbrudd:utbrot nnnb ;
tilhenger:tilhengar nnnb ;
samler:samlar nnnb ;
åpner:opnar nnnb ;
moské:moské nnnb ;
kunstner:kunstnar nnnb ;
hjelpespråk:hjelpespråk nnnb ;
e-mål:e-mål nnnb ;
bryllup:bryllaup nnnb ;
as:as nnnb ;
venn:ven nnnb ;
trelast:trelast nnnb ;
søsken:sysken nnnb ;
slaver:slavar nnnb ;
samfunnsvitenskap:samfunnsvitskap nnnb ;
nøgd:nøgd nnnb ;
mulighet:moglegheit nnnb ;
leskedrikk:leskedrikk nnnb ;
jernbane:jarnbane nnnb ;
hovedkontor:hovudkontor nnnb ;
gudstjeneste:gudsteneste nnnb ;
føresetnad:føresetnad nnnb ;
folkeavstemning:folkerøysting nnnb ;
døger:døger nnnb ;
øye:auge nnnb ;
oppsikt:åtgaum nnnb ;
smerte:vondt nnnb ;
vedhogst:vedhogst nnnb ;
utdannelse:utdaning nnnb ;
ulykke:ulukke nnnb ;
tilvekst:tilvekst nnnb ;
tannsett:tannsett nnnb ;
strengeinstrument:strengeinstrument nnnb ;
skogsområde:skogsområde nnnb ;
redskap:reiskap nnnb ;
q:q nnnb ;
port:port nnnb ;
overskudd:overskot nnnb ;
odelstingspresident:odelstingspresident nnnb ;
nase:nase nnnb ;
medlyd:medlyd nnnb ;
løynd:løynd nnnb ;
levitt:levitt nnnb ;
kjøring:køyring nnnb ;
kløver:kløver nnnb ;
jern:jarn nnnb ;
innehaver:innehavar nnnb ;
imam:imam nnnb ;
hovedrolle:hovudrolle nnnb ;
hiv-smitte:hiv-smitte nnnb ;
halleluja:halleluja nnnb ;
gjennomslag:gjennomslag nnnb ;
frigjøring:frigjering nnnb ;
folketone:folketone nnnb ;
fiolinist:fiolinist nnnb ;
enhver:einkvar nnnb ;
city:city nnnb ;
bolsjevisme:bolsjevisme nnnb ;
aktualitet:aktualitet nnnb ;
ønske:ynskje nnnb ;
vågehval:vågekval nnnb ;
villa:villa nnnb ;
verdensrekord:verdsrekord nnnb ;
uvær:uvêr nnnb ;
utenpå:utanpå nnnb ;
underskudd:underskot nnnb ;
tynnestav:tynnestav nnnb ;
trygghet:tryggje nnnb ;
treningssenter:treningssenter nnnb ;
tjukke:tjukke nnnb ;
tilhører:tilhøyrar nnnb ;
tegner:teiknar nnnb ;
søretter:søretter nnnb ;
støtter:støttar nnnb ;
stortingskandidat:stortingskandidat nnnb ;
statsborger:statsborgar nnnb ;
sportsfiske:sportsfiske nnnb ;
solgangsvind:solgangsvind nnnb ;
småkonge:småkonge nnnb ;
skoleår:skuleår nnnb ;
skolebarn:skulebarn nnnb ;
skott:skot nnnb ;
sjøfartsby:sjøfartsby nnnb ;
sildefiske:sildefiske nnnb ;
samlast:samlast nnnb ;
samfunnsklasse:samfunnsklasse nnnb ;
riff:riff nnnb ;
raudrev:raudrev nnnb ;
presbyter:presbyter nnnb ;
plattysk:plattysk nnnb ;
pasifist:pasifist nnnb ;
palatal:palatal nnnb ;
optativ:optativ nnnb ;
teig:one nnnb ;
olivin:olivin nnnb ;
nu:nu nnnb ;
nedpå:nedpå nnnb ;
naut:naut nnnb ;
muezzin:muezzin nnnb ;
morsarv:morsarv nnnb ;
milliardær:milliardær nnnb ;
middelhavsklima:middelhavsklima nnnb ;
mensjevik:mensjevik nnnb ;
medlemstal:medlemstal nnnb ;
massiv:massiv nnnb ;
marinøkkel:marinøkkel nnnb ;
malaria:malaria nnnb ;
lovbrudd:lovbrot nnnb ;
leser:lesar nnnb ;
landsby:landsby nnnb ;
kirkesamfunn:kyrkjesamfunn nnnb ;
kulestøyt:kulestøyt nnnb ;
krigsmateriell:krigsmateriell nnnb ;
kontrapunkt:kontrapunkt nnnb ;
klatresport:klatresport nnnb ;
kjemper:kjempar nnnb ;
kalott:kalott nnnb ;
jazz:jazz nnnb ;
interpretasjon:interpretasjon nnnb ;
improvisator:improvisator nnnb ;
høytrykksrygg:høgtrykksrygg nnnb ;
husholdning:hushald nnnb ;
historisitet:historisitet nnnb ;
herfra:herfrå nnnb ;
heimfallsrett:heimfallsrett nnnb ;
handelsskip:handelsskip nnnb ;
halvannen:halvannan nnnb ;
gut:gut nnnb ;
gudebilde:gudebilete nnnb ;
grevskap:grevskap nnnb ;
grøt:graut nnnb ;
giv:giv nnnb ;
gammeldansk:gammaldansk nnnb ;
fører:førar nnnb ;
fuglefangst:fuglefangst nnnb ;
friluftsliv:friluftsliv nnnb ;
fribrev:fribrev nnnb ;
framlyd:framlyd nnnb ;
forskingsstasjon:forskingsstasjon nnnb ;
folklorist:folklorist nnnb ;
flash:flash nnnb ;
festmåltid:festmåltid nnnb ;
fagott:fagott nnnb ;
establishment:establishment nnnb ;
eksistens:eksistens nnnb ;
enerett:einerett nnnb ;
effektivitet:effektivitet nnnb ;
driftekar:driftekar nnnb ;
deuterium:deuterium nnnb ;
d-moll:d-moll nnnb ;
cesur:cesur nnnb ;
bygdesenter:bygdesenter nnnb ;
bronkitt:bronkitt nnnb ;
bosnisk:bosnisk nnnb ;
bergirisk:bergirisk nnnb ;
baskisk:baskisk nnnb ;
avgårde:avgarde nnnb ;
akter:atter nnnb ;
arbeidsspråk:arbeidsspråk nnnb ;
akutt:akutt nnnb ;
